dev/determiner/determiner.ne.dix
  <!-- उसै; उसै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उसै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोही; सोही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सोही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उस्; उस्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उस्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यस्तै; यस्तै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यस्तै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यस्तो; यस्त; 3 -->
    <pardef n="यस्त/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ो</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ी</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="f"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यिन; यिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यिन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिन; तिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिन__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- केहि; केहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="केहि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिन्; तिन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिन्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिनै; तिनै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिनै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उहीं; उहीं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उहीं__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिनी; तिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिनी__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तिनि; तिनि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तिनि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कति; कति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उनै; उनै; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उनै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उही; उही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- उन्; उन्; 1 -->
    <pardef n="उन्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- एवं; एवं; 1 -->
    <pardef n="एवं__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यहि; यहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यहि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- केही; केही; 1 -->
    <pardef n="केही__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कस्; कस; 6 -->
    <pardef n="कस/्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्</l>
          <r>्<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्तै</l>
          <r>्<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै-कसै</l>
          <r>्<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>क-</l>
          <r>्<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>्ति</l>
          <r>्<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>क-्</l>
          <r>्<s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जेजति; जेजति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जेजति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कसै; कसै; 2 -->
    <pardef n="कसै__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>कसै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सोहि; सोहि; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सोहि__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- को; को; 1 -->
    <pardef n="को__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जति; जति; 3 -->
    <pardef n="जति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>सुकै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>जति</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यथा; यथा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यथा__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- के; के; 2 -->
    <pardef n="के__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-के</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- फलनो; फलन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="फलन/ो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ा</l>
          <r>ो<s n="det"/><s n="m"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यसो; यसो; 1 -->
    <pardef n="यसो__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- यस्; यस्; 2 -->
    <pardef n="यस्__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- जत्ति; जत्ति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="जत्ति__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- त्यस; त्यस; 2 -->
    <pardef n="त्यस__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ै</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="mf"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="उसै"><i>उसै</i><par n="उसै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="सोही"><i>सोही</i><par n="सोही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उस्"><i>उस्</i><par n="उस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यस्तै"><i>यस्तै</i><par n="यस्तै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यस्तो"><i>यस्त</i><par n="यस्त/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यिन"><i>यिन</i><par n="यिन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तिन"><i>तिन</i><par n="तिन__det"/></e>
    <e lm="केहि"><i>केहि</i><par n="केहि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तिन्"><i>तिन्</i><par n="तिन्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तिनै"><i>तिनै</i><par n="तिनै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उहीं"><i>उहीं</i><par n="उहीं__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तिनी"><i>तिनी</i><par n="तिनी__det"/></e>
    <e lm="तिनि"><i>तिनि</i><par n="तिनि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कति"><i>कति</i><par n="कति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उनै"><i>उनै</i><par n="उनै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उही"><i>उही</i><par n="उही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="उन्"><i>उन्</i><par n="उन्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="एवं"><i>एवं</i><par n="एवं__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यहि"><i>यहि</i><par n="यहि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="केही"><i>केही</i><par n="केही__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कस्"><i>कस</i><par n="कस/्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जेजति"><i>जेजति</i><par n="जेजति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="कसै"><i>कसै</i><par n="कसै__det"/></e>
    <e lm="सोहि"><i>सोहि</i><par n="सोहि__det"/></e>
    <e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="को__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जति"><i>जति</i><par n="जति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यथा"><i>यथा</i><par n="यथा__det"/></e>
    <e lm="के"><i>के</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
    <e lm="फलनो"><i>फलन</i><par n="फलन/ो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यसो"><i>यसो</i><par n="यसो__det"/></e>
    <e lm="यस्"><i>यस्</i><par n="यस्__det"/></e>
    <e lm="जत्ति"><i>जत्ति</i><par n="जत्ति__det"/></e>
    <e lm="त्यस"><i>त्यस</i><par n="त्यस__det"/></e>
